Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.525

Students in department of children, youth, and families out-of-home care—Report on educational experiences.

The education data center shall include in its reporting as part of the P-20 education data project the educational experiences and progress of students in out-of-home care with the department of children, youth, and families. This data should be disaggregated in the smallest units allowable by law that do not identify an individual student, in order to learn which school districts are experiencing the greatest success and challenges in achieving quality educational outcomes with students in out-of-home care with the department of children, youth, and families.

[ 2018 c 58 s 50; 2012 c 163 s 11; 2008 c 297 s 2; (2009 c 556 s 11 expired July 1, 2011).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Effective date—2012 c 163: See notes following RCW 28B.117.010.

Expiration date—2009 c 556 ss 11, 13, and 15: "Sections 11, 13, and 15 of this act expire July 1, 2011." [ 2009 c 556 s 21.]